Washington statutes.
RCW 26.20.035

Family nonsupport—Penalty—Exception.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who is able to provide support, or has the ability to earn the means to provide support, and who:

(a) Willfully omits to provide necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance to a child dependent upon him or her; or

(b) Willfully omits to provide necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical attendance to his or her spouse or his or her domestic partner,

is guilty of the crime of family nonsupport.

(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified person at an appropriate location pursuant to RCW 13.34.360 is not subject to criminal liability under this section.

(3) The crime of family nonsupport is a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1040; 2002 c 331 s 7; 1984 c 260 s 27.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 331: See notes following RCW 13.34.360.